test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper_gt-norm.yaml
  Propernoun - Snøhvitprosjækta: # MARJA-obj
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom: [Snøhvitprosjækta, Snøhvitprosjäkta]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Acc: Snøhvitprosjevtav
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ine: Snøhvitprosjevtan
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill: [Snøhvitprosjæktaj, Snøhvitprosjäktaj]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela: Snøhvitprosjevtas
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Com: Snøhvitprosjevtajn
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Nom: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Pl+Ill: Snøhvitprosjevtajda
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Ess: [Snøhvitprosjæktan, Snøhvitprosjäktan]
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Stuorradigge: # MARJA-org
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Stuorradigge
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Stuorradikke
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Stuorradikkev
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Stuorradikken
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Stuorradiggáj
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Stuorradikkes
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Stuorradikkijn
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: []
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Stuorradiggen
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Birtsse: # MARJA-sur
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Birtssev
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Birtssen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Birtssáj
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Birtsses
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Birtssijn
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Birtsse
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Birtssijda
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Birtssen
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Birtsse+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
